Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 30

Reflexology Practitioners Registration Act of 2001

63-30-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Reflexology Practitioners Registration Act of 2001.”

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 2.

63-30-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Certification” means completion of a two hundred (200) hour reflexology only course offered by an institution approved by the Tennessee higher education commission or its equivalent in other states;

“Client” means any person who engages the services of a reflexology practitioner;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Division” means the division of health-related boards in the department of health;

“Reflexology” means the application of specific pressures to reflex points in the hands and feet only;

“Reflexology practitioner” or “reflexologist” means any person who engages in the practice of reflexology for compensation and who has completed a study of the principles of reflexology, anatomy and physiology generally included in a regular course of study of reflexology; and

“Registration” means satisfying the requirements for registration by the department of health.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 3; 2004, ch. 465, § 1.

63-30-103. Registration.

No person shall engage in the practice of reflexology unless such person has registered with the division of health-related boards.

No person shall be registered to practice reflexology unless such person completes all necessary application forms and can demonstrate to the satisfaction of the division that such person complies with the criteria specified in this chapter.

Any person who desires registration as a certified reflexologist shall submit an application to the division on the prescribed forms. The application shall be accompanied by:

Documentation of completion of a two hundred (200) hour reflexology only course offered by an institution approved by the Tennessee higher education commission or its equivalent in other states;

Proof that the applicant has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

Two (2) character references stating that the applicant is of good moral character;

A statement certifying that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state or any other state for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the applicant's fitness to practice competently, as determined by the division. However, such determination shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title; and

All required fees.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 4; 2004, ch. 465, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 719, § 7; 2018, ch. 745, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which amended (c)(4), took effect on April 6, 2016, and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added the second sentence in (c)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-30-104. [Reserved.]

This chapter shall not apply to the activities or services of physicians, chiropractors, physical therapists, occupational therapists, athletic trainers, cosmetologists, registered nurses, massage therapists, or members of other professions licensed, certified, or registered by the state who may, on occasion, apply pressure to specific reflex points in the hands and feet in the course of their work.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 6.

63-30-106. Registration of applicants from another state.

The division shall register an individual from another state who applies for registration, pays the applicable fees, meets or exceeds the requirements established by this chapter, and who has no imposed or pending disciplinary actions in any state.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 7.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-30-107. Use of title.

Reflexologists registered by the state may hold themselves out as “registered certified reflexologists” and may use the title or the initials “RCR” following the person's name in connection with the profession. No person may use the title “registered certified reflexologist” or the initials “RCR” unless registered in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 8.

63-30-108. Unauthorized practice — Violations — Penalties.

Except as provided in subsection (b), any person who advertises or engages in reflexology for compensation without registering with the division pursuant to this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor, punishable by a fine only. It is unlawful to use the word “reflexology” or any other term that implies reflexology technique or method when advertising a service by a person who is not registered under this chapter.

This section shall not apply to licensed massage therapists who use reflexology techniques or methods or who advertise reflexology as a service offered to massage therapy clients.

The division may, when it deems appropriate, seek such civil remedies at law or equity to restrain or enjoin any unauthorized practice or other violation of this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 9; 2002, ch. 637, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-123.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-30-109. Prohibited practices.

A registered reflexologist may not use invasive procedures during the practice of reflexology.

A registered reflexologist may not diagnose or treat for specific diseases, practice spinal or other joint manipulations, prescribe, administer, or adjust medication, or prescribe or administer vitamins.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 10.

63-30-110. Fees for registration — Renewal.

Fees for the registration of a certified reflexologist shall be determined by the division but shall not exceed the costs of investigations, disciplinary actions and administering the registration process for certified reflexologists. Registration shall be valid for two (2) years and shall be renewed biennially.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 11.

Cross-References. License and registration fees, § 63-1-123.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

63-30-111. Revocation or suspension of registration — Civil penalties — Complaints.

The registration of a certified reflexologist may be revoked or suspended by the division or the division may impose a civil penalty upon a finding that the person is guilty of any one (1) or more of the following:

The practitioner is guilty of gross health care liability or incompetence;

The practitioner's mental or physical health endangers public health or safety;

The practitioner is guilty of false or deceptive advertising;

The practitioner engages in unprofessional conduct;

The practitioner falsifies any requirements for registration as set forth;

The practitioner is convicted of a felony for the commission of an offense that bears directly on the practitioner's fitness to practice competently, as determined by the division;

The practitioner is subject to disciplinary action in another state; or

The unauthorized practice of reflexology.

Any person may file with the department of health's office of investigations a written complaint against a registered reflexologist for any violation of this chapter.

Complaints alleging violations of this chapter, or any rule duly promulgated pursuant to § 63-30-112, shall be filed with the division, and shall be resolved by the division in accordance with this chapter and the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. A file shall be maintained on each such complaint filed with the division and shall reflect all activities taken by the division in response to such complaint.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 12; 2012, ch. 798, § 50; 2016, ch. 719, § 8; 2018, ch. 745, § 44.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 719, § 11 provided that this act, which amended (a)(6), took effect on April 6, 2016, and shall apply to actions instituted by state entities on or after April 6, 2016.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-30-112. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee may promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to administer this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 13.

63-30-113. Advisory private letter rulings.

The division may issue advisory private letter rulings to any affected registrant who makes such a request regarding any matters within the division's primary jurisdiction. Such private letter ruling shall only affect the registrant making such inquiry, and shall have no precedential value for any other inquiry or future contested case to come before the division. Any dispute regarding a private letter ruling may, if the division chooses to do so, be resolved pursuant to the declaratory order provisions of § 4-5-223.

Acts 2001, ch. 389, § 14.

63-30-105. Application.